analyzer/ilomorph.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+Sg +Du +Pl
+1Erg +2Erg +3Erg
+SgErg +DuErg +PlErg
+InclErg +ExclErg
+1Abs +2Abs +3Abs
+SgAbs +DuAbs +PlAbs
+InclAbs +ExclAbs
^GUESSNOUNSTEM

LEXICON Root
0:0 Prefix;

LEXICON Prefix
0:%<RED%> Stem;
0:0 Stem;

LEXICON PostStem
Enclitic;
#;

LEXICON Enclitic
+1Abs+SgAbs:ak #;
+2Abs+SgAbs:ka #;
+3Abs+SgAbs:isu #;
+1Abs+DuAbs+InclAbs:ta #;
+1Abs+PlAbs+ExclAbs:kami #;
+1Abs+PlAbs+InclAbs:tayo #;
+3Abs+PlAbs:da #;
+1Erg+SgErg:ko #;
+2Erg+SgErg:mo #;
+3Erg+SgErg:na #;
+1Erg+SgErg:k #;
+2Erg+SgErg:m #;
+1Erg+DuErg+InclErg:ta #;
+1Erg+PlErg+ExclErg:mi #;
+1Erg+PlErg+InclErg:tayo #;
+2Erg+PlErg:yo #;
+3Erg+PlErg:da #;
+1Erg+SgErg+2Abs+SgAbs:ka #;
+1Erg+SgErg+3Abs+SgAbs:ko #;
+1Erg+SgErg+3Abs+SgAbs:k #;
+2Erg+SgErg+1Abs+SgAbs:nak #;
+3Erg+SgErg+1Abs+SgAbs:nak #;
+2Erg+PlErg+1Abs+SgAbs:dak #;
+3Erg+PlErg+1Abs+SgAbs:dak #;
+3Erg+SgErg+2Abs+SgAbs:naka #;
+1Erg+PlErg+ExclErg+2Abs+SgAbs:daka #;
+3Erg+PlErg+2Abs+SgAbs:daka #;
+2Erg+SgErg+3Abs+SgAbs:mo #;
+2Erg+SgErg+3Abs+SgAbs:m #;
+3Erg+SgErg+3Abs+SgAbs:na #;
+1Erg+DuErg+InclErg+3Abs+SgAbs:ta #;
+1Erg+PlErg+ExclErg+3Abs+SgAbs:mi #;
+1Erg+PlErg+InclErg+3Abs+SgAbs:tayo #;
+2Erg+PlErg+3Abs+SgAbs:yo #;
+3Erg+PlErg+3Abs+SgAbs:da #;
+3Erg+SgErg+1Abs+DuAbs+InclAbs:nata #;
+2Erg+PlErg+1Abs+DuAbs+InclAbs:data #;
+3Erg+PlErg+1Abs+DuAbs+InclAbs:data #;
+2Erg+SgErg+1Abs+PlAbs+ExclAbs:nakami #;
+3Erg+SgErg+1Abs+PlAbs+ExclAbs:nakami #;
+2Erg+PlErg+1Abs+PlAbs+ExclAbs:dakami #;
+3Erg+PlErg+1Abs+PlAbs+ExclAbs:dakami #;
+3Erg+SgErg+1Abs+PlAbs+InclAbs:natayo #;
+3Erg+PlErg+1Abs+PlAbs+InclAbs:datayo #;
+1Erg+SgErg+2Abs+PlAbs:kayo #;
+3Erg+SgErg+2Abs+PlAbs:nakayo #;
+1Erg+PlErg+ExclErg+2Abs+PlAbs:dakayo #;
+3Erg+PlErg+2Abs+PlAbs:dakayo #;

LEXICON Stem
patigmaan Enclitic; ! advice
ayam Enclitic; ! amusement
panangipakat Enclitic; ! application
badang Enclitic; ! assistance
dori-dori Enclitic; ! back bone
lakatan Enclitic; ! banana
kasi Enclitic; ! because
nagayyanakan Enclitic; ! birthplace
ubing Enclitic; ! boyfriend
kabsat Enclitic; ! brother
ubet Enclitic; ! buttocks
kargamento Enclitic; ! cargo
bodega Enclitic; ! cellar
piek Enclitic; ! chick
tawen Enclitic; ! climate
dagup Enclitic; ! collection
panangngaasi Enclitic; ! compassion
riribuk Enclitic; ! confusion
sungani Enclitic; ! contradiction
appit Enclitic; ! cousin
alipugpog Enclitic; ! cyclone
idaton Enclitic; ! dedication
katawaan Enclitic; ! depride
panangi-pangpangruma Enclitic; ! devotion
panangisuro Enclitic; ! direction
pannakaulaw Enclitic; ! dizziness
ringngat Enclitic; ! drought
mahisursuro Enclitic; ! educator
pagtrabahuan Enclitic; ! employment
pagdalus Enclitic; ! eraser
kaadda Enclitic; ! existence
kablaawen Enclitic; ! falicitate
baliti Enclitic; ! fig tree
kinaalikuteg Enclitic; ! folly
kinabatad Enclitic; ! frankness
ariwanas Enclitic; ! galaxy
rambak Enclitic; ! gladness
lolo Enclitic; ! grandfather
panangalilaw Enclitic; ! guile
panagtunos Enclitic; ! harmony
letteg Enclitic; ! hernia
abong Enclitic; ! hovel
tubeng Enclitic; ! impediment
dunor Enclitic; ! injury
managpartuat Enclitic; ! inventor
Junio Enclitic; ! june
sursuro Enclitic; ! knowledge
naderep Enclitic; ! leacherous
agsikig Enclitic; ! lie on side
kuto Enclitic; ! louse
kriminal Enclitic; ! malefactor
lasag Enclitic; ! meat
milonario Enclitic; ! millionaire
kuarta Enclitic; ! money
kaaduan Enclitic; ! multitude
pahiwarnak Enclitic; ! newspaper
kalakyan Enclitic; ! nuang calf
baybay Enclitic; ! ocean
mamadto Enclitic; ! oracle
panagtalna Enclitic; ! pacification
pagnaan Enclitic; ! path
pammalubos Enclitic; ! permission
kamuro Enclitic; ! pimple
politiko Enclitic; ! politician
pahimalditan Enclitic; ! printing press
kinapintas Enclitic; ! pulchritude
panagtutudo Enclitic; ! rainy season
pakalaglahipan Enclitic; ! remembrance
panagungar Enclitic; ! resurrection
karayan Enclitic; ! river
marinero Enclitic; ! sailor
nalaing Enclitic; ! scholar
rikna Enclitic; ! sensation
agpaltik Enclitic; ! shoot with rubber band
bangabanga Enclitic; ! skull
klasse Enclitic; ! species
agtonged Enclitic; ! stimulate milk supply
singasing Enclitic; ! suggestion
bayyek Enclitic; ! tadpole
sulisog Enclitic; ! temptation
dadal Enclitic; ! thimble
kinakired Enclitic; ! toughness
pantalon Enclitic; ! trousers
tio Enclitic; ! uncle
oki Enclitic; ! vagina
kasuno Enclitic; ! vice
kinapigsa Enclitic; ! vitality
bimpo Enclitic; ! washcloth
dakami Enclitic; ! we
kanito Enclitic; ! while
baket Enclitic; ! woman
wen Enclitic; ! yes
ngatuen Enclitic; ! above
ibilang Enclitic; ! account
nasiglat Enclitic; ! active
makikadua Enclitic; ! affiliate
agkaingas Enclitic; ! alike
dagup Enclitic; ! amount
madukotan Enclitic; ! anxious
aritmetika Enclitic; ! arithmetic
damahen Enclitic; ! ask
babaonen Enclitic; ! attendant
apag-kanito Enclitic; ! awhile
piansa Enclitic; ! bail
baybay Enclitic; ! bay
kasanguanan Enclitic; ! before
sentrom Enclitic; ! belt
tawar Enclitic; ! bid
nangisit Enclitic; ! black
nadara Enclitic; ! bloody
pagbureken Enclitic; ! boil
naringgor Enclitic; ! bothersome
perdi Enclitic; ! break
alaen Enclitic; ! bring
presupuesto Enclitic; ! budget
takawan Enclitic; ! burglarize
gumatang Enclitic; ! buy
nabatad Enclitic; ! candid
agannad Enclitic; ! careful
iwalin Enclitic; ! cast
bunga Enclitic; ! cereal
panagbaliw Enclitic; ! change
marka Enclitic; ! check
mapili Enclitic; ! choose
tagari Enclitic; ! clatter
relo Enclitic; ! clock
Amerikkaan Enclitic; ! coat
pagtiponen Enclitic; ! combine
salisalen Enclitic; ! compete
iturong Enclitic; ! conduct
launen Enclitic; ! consist
kasupadi Enclitic; ! contrast
tuladen Enclitic; ! copy
kapasanglay Enclitic; ! cotton
kappi Enclitic; ! crab
utang Enclitic; ! credit
naranggas Enclitic; ! cruel
pangpaimbagan Enclitic; ! cure
agduadua Enclitic; ! cynical
kaayan-ayat Enclitic; ! darling
ipalawag Enclitic; ! declare
kariten Enclitic; ! defy
ussoban Enclitic; ! denude
umulog Enclitic; ! descend
naikari Enclitic; ! destined
kurang Enclitic; ! devoid
ikali Enclitic; ! dig
bingkol Enclitic; ! dirt
biroken Enclitic; ! discover
riribuk Enclitic; ! disorder
rigat Enclitic; ! distress
kasuratan Enclitic; ! document
dua Enclitic; ! double
tagtagainep Enclitic; ! dream
patiten Enclitic; ! drum
natibker Enclitic; ! durable
nailulongan Enclitic; ! earthly
napigsa Enclitic; ! effective
nakttong Enclitic; ! emaciated
asikasuen Enclitic; ! engage
apal Enclitic; ! envy
uray Enclitic; ! even
kigtoten Enclitic; ! excite
nangina Enclitic; ! expensive
murdong Enclitic; ! extreme
nakairuaman Enclitic; ! familiar
tata Enclitic; ! father
paset Enclitic; ! feature
alaen Enclitic; ! fetch
manglapped Enclitic; ! filibuster
lames Enclitic; ! fish
apagdarikmat Enclitic; ! fleeting
nalasbang Enclitic; ! florid
angep Enclitic; ! fog
umuna Enclitic; ! fore
maikauppat Enclitic; ! fourth
tukak Enclitic; ! frog
puno Enclitic; ! full
agnganga Enclitic; ! gape
naayat Enclitic; ! gay
barikes Enclitic; ! girdle
nagloriaan Enclitic; ! glorious
agturay Enclitic; ! govern
tanem Enclitic; ! grave
maulaw Enclitic; ! groggy
uglai Enclitic; ! habit
kamangan Enclitic; ! harbor
managpannakkel Enclitic; ! haughty
gabsuon Enclitic; ! heap
natured Enclitic; ! heroic
abangan Enclitic; ! hire
idayaw Enclitic; ! honor
ungor Enclitic; ! howl
gangtan Enclitic; ! ignite
naparammag Enclitic; ! immodest
iraman Enclitic; ! include
masaksakit Enclitic; ! infirm
iti Enclitic; ! in
sa Enclitic; ! in
panghep Enclitic; ! intent
plansa Enclitic; ! iron
obra Enclitic; ! job
kedngan Enclitic; ! judge
pumaslang Enclitic; ! kill
natadem Enclitic; ! knife
kurang Enclitic; ! lack
naladaw Enclitic; ! late
ahiray Enclitic; ! lean
isilpo Enclitic; ! lengthen
gangtan Enclitic; ! light
idayaw Enclitic; ! lionize
nakasimsimbron Enclitic; ! loathsome
kitaen Enclitic; ! look
kayo Enclitic; ! lumber
awisen Enclitic; ! magnetize
adu Enclitic; ! manifold
agmasahe Enclitic; ! massage
tumeken Enclitic; ! maul
taripnong Enclitic; ! meeting
pagrukod Enclitic; ! meter
iparangarang Enclitic; ! mirror
napateg Enclitic; ! momentous
nanang Enclitic; ! mother
adu Enclitic; ! much
busal Enclitic; ! muzzle
nahistayan Enclitic; ! nearly
managtiherher Enclitic; ! nervous
natan-ok Enclitic; ! noble
kabibiag Enclitic; ! novel
panghep Enclitic; ! objective
makaparurod Enclitic; ! offensive
bulding Enclitic; ! one-eyed
ibilin Enclitic; ! ordain
parukmaen Enclitic; ! overpower
panid Enclitic; ! page
bungon Enclitic; ! parcel
lumabas Enclitic; ! pass
perlas Enclitic; ! pearl
bangbanglo Enclitic; ! perfume
atsara Enclitic; ! pickle
tubo Enclitic; ! pipe
katam Enclitic; ! plane
dawat Enclitic; ! pleading
bolsa Enclitic; ! pocket
agkararag Enclitic; ! pray
seguru Enclitic; ! probably
abutan Enclitic; ! puncture
rakit Enclitic; ! raft
agbasa Enclitic; ! ready
makapalamiis Enclitic; ! refreshing
nadayaw Enclitic; ! respectful
yaalsa Enclitic; ! revolt
napeggad Enclitic; ! risky
lampasuan Enclitic; ! rub
tubbog Enclitic; ! sap
pungtot Enclitic; ! scorn
managpili Enclitic; ! selective
sirok Enclitic; ! shade
agtigariher Enclitic; ! shiver
agbangir Enclitic; ! sidewise
kamanaw Enclitic; ! skin
naangdod Enclitic; ! smell
nakaay-ay-ay Enclitic; ! solemn
sibatin Enclitic; ! spear
iruhi Enclitic; ! start
boksit Enclitic; ! stomach
danungen Enclitic; ! strike
susopen Enclitic; ! suck
panagsirpat Enclitic; ! survey
buntot Enclitic; ! tail
kalalamganna Enclitic; ! temperate
pumapayat Enclitic; ! thinner
naet-et Enclitic; ! tight
rigat Enclitic; ! torment
pamitluen Enclitic; ! treble
tuno Enclitic; ! tune
nagulib Enclitic; ! unfaithful
kaadduan Enclitic; ! usually
panangsupiat Enclitic; ! veto
agkalawikiw Enclitic; ! wag
siputan Enclitic; ! watch
ikasar Enclitic; ! wed
agsagsagawisiw Enclitic; ! whistling
nakakita Enclitic; ! witness
nagkuretret Enclitic; ! wrinkled
